District of Columbia statutes.
48-853.06

Interoperability; information exchange with other prescription drug monitoring programs.

(a)

The Director may enter into written agreements with other prescription drug monitoring programs, or a third party, approved by the Director, that operates an interstate prescription drug monitoring exchange, for the purpose of interoperability and the mutual exchange of information among prescription drug monitoring programs, and describing the terms and conditions for the sharing of prescription information under this section.

(b)

The Director may provide prescription monitoring information pursuant to such agreements, which shall only use the information for the purposes allowed by this chapter.

(c)

The Director may request and receive prescription drug monitoring information from other states’ prescription drug monitoring programs and may use the information under the provisions of this chapter.

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-66, § 7, 61 DCR 7